test/src/morphology/N-soqv_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - soʼv: # Noun 122 'eng /est suits/fin' - full paradigm
     soʼv+N+Sg+Nom: soʼv
     soʼv+N+Sg+Gen: soʼv
     soʼv+N+Sg+Par: soʼvvõ
     soʼv+N+Sg+Dat: soʼvvõn
     soʼv+N+Sg+Ins: soʼvvõks
     soʼv+N+Sg+Ill: soʼvvõ
     soʼv+N+Sg+Ela: soʼvstõ
     soʼv+N+Pl+Nom: soʼvd
     soʼv+N+Pl+Gen: soʼvd
     soʼv+N+Pl+Par: soʼvḑi
     soʼv+N+Pl+Dat: soʼvdõn
     soʼv+N+Pl+Ins: soʼvdõks
     soʼv+N+Pl+Ill: soʼvži
     soʼv+N+Pl+Ela: soʼvšti
